Illinois, session 104th, HB4657.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Sections 3-3-13 and 3-3-14 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-13)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-13)7    Sec. 3-3-13. Procedure for executive clemency. 8    (a) Petitions seeking pardon, commutation, or reprieve 9shall be addressed to the Governor and filed with the Prisoner 10Review Board. The petition shall be in writing and signed by 11the person under conviction or by a person on his behalf. It 12shall contain a brief history of the case, the reasons for 13seeking executive clemency, and other relevant information the 14Board may require.15    (a-5) After a petition has been denied by the Governor, 16the Board may not accept a repeat petition for executive 17clemency for the same person until one full year has elapsed 18from the date of the denial. The Chairman of the Board may 19waive the one-year requirement if the petitioner offers in 20writing new information that was unavailable to the petitioner 21at the time of the filing of the prior petition and which the 22Chairman determines to be significant. The Chairman also may 23waive the one-year waiting period if the petitioner can show   HB4657- 2 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1that a change in circumstances of a compelling humanitarian 2nature has arisen since the denial of the prior petition.3    (b) Notice of the proposed application shall be given by 4the Board to the committing court and the state's attorney of 5the county where the conviction was had. Upon request, the 6Department of Corrections shall provide disciplinary records 7of the petitioner to the State's Attorney of the county in 8which the conviction had been entered. Any State's Attorney 9provided disciplinary records of a petitioner is prohibited 10from disseminating the disciplinary records or their contents. 11The records and the information contained in the records may 12only be disclosed as part of a response to a petition for 13clemency or during a related clemency hearing. 14    (b-5) Victims registered with the Board shall receive 15reasonable written notice not less than 30 days prior to the 16executive clemency hearing date. The victim has the right to 17submit a victim statement, in support or opposition, to the 18Prisoner Review Board for consideration at an executive 19clemency hearing as provided in subsection (c) of this 20Section. Victim statements provided to the Board shall be 21confidential and privileged, including any statements received 22prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 23General Assembly, except if the statement was an oral 24statement made by the victim at a hearing open to the public. 25    (c) The Board shall, upon due notice, give a hearing to 26each application, allowing representation by counsel, if   HB4657- 3 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1desired, after which it shall confidentially advise the 2Governor by a written report of its recommendations which 3shall be determined by majority vote. The written report to 4the Governor shall be confidential and privileged, including 5any reports made prior to the effective date of this 6amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. The Board shall 7meet to consider such petitions no less than 4 times each year.8    (d) The Governor shall decide each application and 9communicate his decision to the Board which shall notify the 10petitioner.11    In the event a petitioner who has been convicted of a Class 12X felony is granted a release, after the Governor has 13communicated such decision to the Board, the Board shall give 14written notice to the Sheriff of the county from which the 15offender was sentenced if such sheriff has requested that such 16notice be given on a continuing basis. In cases where arrest of 17the offender or the commission of the offense took place in any 18municipality with a population of more than 10,000 persons, 19the Board shall also give written notice to the proper law 20enforcement agency for said municipality which has requested 21notice on a continuing basis.22    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 23the power of the Governor under the constitution to grant a 24reprieve, commutation of sentence, or pardon.25(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 104-11, eff. 6-20-25.)   HB4657- 4 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-14)2    Sec. 3-3-14. Procedure for medical release.3    (a) Definitions.4        (1) As used in this Section, "medically incapacitated" 5    means that a petitioner has any diagnosable medical 6    condition, including dementia and severe, permanent 7    medical or cognitive disability, that prevents the 8    petitioner from completing more than one activity of daily 9    living without assistance or that incapacitates the 10    petitioner to the extent that institutional confinement 11    does not offer additional restrictions, and that the 12    condition is unlikely to improve noticeably in the future.13        (2) As used in this Section, "terminal illness" means 14    a condition that satisfies all of the following criteria: 15            (i) the condition is irreversible and incurable; 16        and17            (ii) in accordance with medical standards and a 18        reasonable degree of medical certainty, based on an 19        individual assessment of the petitioner, the condition 20        is likely to cause death to the petitioner within 18 21        months. 22    (b) The Prisoner Review Board shall consider an 23application for compassionate release on behalf of any 24petitioner who meets any of the following:25        (1) is suffering from a terminal illness; or26        (2) has been diagnosed with a condition that will   HB4657- 5 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1    result in medical incapacity within the next 6 months; or2        (3) has become medically incapacitated subsequent to 3    sentencing due to illness or injury. 4    (c) Initial application. 5        (1) An initial application for medical release may be 6    filed with the Prisoner Review Board by the petitioner, a 7    prison official, a medical professional who has treated or 8    diagnosed the petitioner, or the petitioner's spouse, 9    parent, guardian, grandparent, aunt or uncle, sibling, 10    child over the age of eighteen years, or attorney. If the 11    initial application is made by someone other than the 12    petitioner, the petitioner, or if the petitioner is 13    medically unable to consent, the guardian or family member 14    designated to represent the petitioner's interests must 15    consent to the application at the time of the 16    institutional hearing.17        (2) Application materials shall be maintained on the 18    Prisoner Review Board's website and the Department of 19    Corrections' website and maintained in a clearly visible 20    place within the law library and the infirmary of every 21    penal institution and facility operated by the Department 22    of Corrections. 23        (3) The initial application need not be notarized, can 24    be sent via email or facsimile, and must contain the 25    following information: 26            (i) the petitioner's name and Illinois Department   HB4657- 6 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1        of Corrections number;2            (ii) the petitioner's diagnosis;3            (iii) a statement that the petitioner meets one of 4        the following diagnostic criteria: 5                (A) the petitioner is suffering from a 6            terminal illness;7                (B) the petitioner has been diagnosed with a 8            condition that will result in medical incapacity 9            within the next 6 months; or10                (C) the petitioner has become medically 11            incapacitated subsequent to sentencing due to 12            illness or injury. 13        (3.5) The Prisoner Review Board shall place no 14    additional restrictions, limitations, or requirements on 15    applications from petitioners. 16        (4) Upon receiving the petitioner's initial 17    application, the Board shall order the Department of 18    Corrections to have a physician or nurse practitioner 19    evaluate the petitioner and create a written evaluation 20    within ten days of the Board's order. The evaluation shall 21    include but need not be limited to: 22            (i) a concise statement of the petitioner medical 23        diagnosis, including prognosis, likelihood of 24        recovery, and primary symptoms, to include 25        incapacitation; and26            (ii) a statement confirming or denying that the   HB4657- 7 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1        petitioner meets one of the criteria stated in 2        subsection (b) of this Section. 3        (5) Upon a determination that the petitioner is 4    eligible for a hearing, the Prisoner Review Board shall:5            (i) provide public notice of the petitioner's 6        name, docket number, counsel, and hearing date; and7            (ii) provide a copy of the evaluation and any 8        medical records provided by the Department of 9        Corrections to the petitioner or the petitioner's 10        attorney upon scheduling the institutional hearing.11        (6) Upon an application for compassionate release, the 12    Department of Corrections shall provide the State's 13    Attorney serving the county in which the applying 14    petitioner's conviction was entered with a copy of the 15    petitioner's complete disciplinary files and complete 16    medical file and any evaluations, whether by prison 17    medical staff or outside medical providers, which form the 18    basis for the petitioner's application for compassionate 19    release. The records shall remain in the exclusive 20    possession of the State's Attorney and shall not be 21    disclosed other than in hearings on compassionate release 22    or written responses to the petitioner's compassionate 23    release petition. 24    (d) Institutional hearing. Hearings are public unless the 25petitioner requests a non-public hearing. The petitioner has a 26right to attend the hearing and to speak on the petitioner's   HB4657- 8 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1own behalf. The petitioner may be represented by counsel and 2may present witnesses to the Board members. Hearings shall be 3governed by the Open Parole Hearings Act. Members of the 4public shall be permitted to freely attend public hearings 5without restriction. 6    (e) Voting procedure. Petitions shall be considered by 7three-member panels, and decisions shall be made by simple 8majority. Voting shall take place during the public hearing. 9    (f) Consideration. In considering a petition for release 10under the statute, the Prisoner Review Board may consider the 11following factors: 12            (i) the petitioner's diagnosis and likelihood of 13        recovery;14            (ii) the approximate cost of health care to the 15        State should the petitioner remain in custody;16            (iii) the impact that the petitioner's continued 17        incarceration may have on the provision of medical 18        care within the Department;19            (iv) the present likelihood of and ability to pose 20        a substantial danger to the physical safety of a 21        specifically identifiable person or persons;22            (v) any statements by the victim regarding 23        release; and24            (vi) whether the petitioner's condition was 25        explicitly disclosed to the original sentencing judge 26        and taken into account at the time of sentencing.   HB4657- 9 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1    (f-1) Upon denying an eligible petitioner's application 2for medical release, the Prisoner Review Board shall publish a 3decision letter outlining the reason for denial. The decision 4letter must include an explanation of each statutory factor 5and the estimated annual cost of the petitioner's continued 6incarceration, including the petitioner's medical care. 7    (g) Petitioners granted medical release shall be released 8on mandatory supervised release for a period of 5 years 9subject to Section 3-3-8, which shall operate to discharge any 10remaining term of years imposed upon him or her. However, in no 11event shall the eligible person serve a period of mandatory 12supervised release greater than the aggregate of the 13discharged underlying sentence and the mandatory supervised 14release period as set forth in Section 5-4.5-20.15    (h) Within 90 days of the receipt of the initial 16application, the Prisoner Review Board shall conduct a hearing 17if a hearing is requested and render a decision granting or 18denying the petitioner's request for release.19    (i) Nothing in this statute shall preclude a petitioner 20from seeking alternative forms of release, including clemency, 21relief from the sentencing court, post-conviction relief, or 22any other legal remedy.23    (j) This act applies retroactively, and shall be 24applicable to all currently incarcerated people in Illinois.25    (k) Data report. The Department of Corrections and the 26Prisoner Review Board shall release a report annually   HB4657- 10 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1published on their websites that reports the following 2information about the Medical Release Program:3        (1) The number of applications for medical release 4    received by the Board in the preceding year, and 5    information about those applications, including: 6            (i) demographic data about the petitioner, 7        including race or ethnicity, gender, age, and 8        institution;9            (ii) the highest class of offense for which the 10        petitioner is incarcerated;11            (iii) the relationship of the petitioner to the 12        person completing the application;13            (iv) whether the petitioner had applied for 14        medical release before and been denied, and, if so, 15        when;16            (v) whether the petitioner applied as a person who 17        is medically incapacitated or a person who is 18        terminally ill;19            (vi) a basic description of the underlying medical 20        condition that led to the application; and 21            (vii) the institution in which the petitioner was 22        confined at the time of the application. 23        (2) The number of medical statements from the 24    Department of Corrections received by the Board.25        (3) The number of institutional hearings on medical 26    release applications conducted by the Board including:  HB4657- 11 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1            (i) whether the petitioner was represented by an 2        attorney; and3            (ii) whether the application was considered in a 4        public or non-public hearing.5        (4) The number of people approved for medical release, 6    and information about them, including: 7            (i) demographic data about the individual 8        including race or ethnicity, gender, age, and zip code 9        to which they were released;10            (ii) whether the person applied as a person who is 11        medically incapacitated or a person who is terminally 12        ill;13            (iii) a basic description of the underlying 14        medical condition that led to the application;15            (iv) a basic description of the medical setting 16        the person was released to; 17            (v) whether the petitioner was represented by an 18        attorney; and19            (vi) whether the application was considered in a 20        public or non-public hearing. 21        (5) The number of people released on the medical 22    release program.23        (6) The number of people approved for medical release 24    who experienced more than a one-month delay between 25    release decision and ultimate release, including: 26            (i) demographic data about the individuals   HB4657- 12 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1        including race or ethnicity, gender and age;2            (ii) the reason for the delay;3            (iii) whether the person remains incarcerated; and4            (iv) a basic description of the underlying medical 5        condition of the applying person. 6        (7) For those individuals released on mandatory 7    supervised release due to a granted application for 8    medical release: 9            (i) the number of individuals who were serving 10        terms of mandatory supervised release because of 11        medical release applications during the previous year; 12            (ii) the number of individuals who had their 13        mandatory supervised release revoked; and14            (iii) the number of individuals who died during 15        the previous year. 16        (8) Information on seriously ill individuals 17    incarcerated at the Department of Corrections, including: 18            (i) the number of people currently receiving 19        full-time one-on-one medical care or assistance with 20        activities of daily living within Department of 21        Corrections facilities and whether that care is 22        provided by a medical practitioner or an incarcerated 23        person, along with the institutions at which they are 24        incarcerated; and25            (ii) the number of people who spent more than one 26        month in outside hospital care during the previous   HB4657- 13 -LRB104 17402 RLC 30827 b1        year and their home institutions. 2    All the information provided in this report shall be 3provided in aggregate, and nothing shall be construed to 4require the public dissemination of any personal medical 5information. 6(Source: P.A. 104-11, eff. 6-20-25.)